Arkansas, session 2025, SB250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-37-102(5), concerning definitions
pertaining to pest control, is repealed.
(5) “Director” means the Director of the State Plant Board;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-37-102(10), concerning definitions
pertaining to pest control, is amended to read as follows:
(10) “Licensed operator” means a person who has fully qualified
and has passed the board's written examination and has in force a valid
license from the board Department of Agriculture to engage in the work
indicated in the license. The person shall also have met the requirements of
and be eligible for certification under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide,
and Rodenticide Act and state law as a commercial applicator;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-37-102(16), concerning definitions
pertaining to pest control, is amended to read as follows:
(16) “Solicitor” means any person registered with the board
*LGL066*
02/18/2025 9:24:51 AM LGL066

SB250
Department of Agriculture by a licensed operator to solicit or sell pest
control service work, which the operator is licensed to perform, but the
solicitor may not perform any pest control service work nor be placed in
charge of workers or working crews;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-37-105(b), concerning the administration
of the State Plant Board, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The board Department of Agriculture or its authorized
representative may enter upon and inspect properties, plants, or products for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter and of carrying
out the rules made pursuant to this chapter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-37-202 is repealed.
17-37-202. Exemption for unlicensed operators under supervision of
license holders.
(a) Persons who are not licensed as pest control operators under this
chapter but who worked as unlicensed pest control operators before November
1, 1984, under the direct supervision of a holder of a license under this
chapter, and who are working for such a license holder on June 28, 1985, may
continue that arrangement without complying with this chapter.
(b) At the time the unlicensed pest control operators terminate their
relationship with the license holder, the unlicensed pest control operators
shall not thereafter perform services as pest control operators unless and
until they have qualified under this chapter. However, when the licensed
manager of a pest control company terminates his or her employment with the
company, and if the company had been in operation at least one (1) year
before the date of termination, the pest control company may continue to
operate for a period not to exceed six (6) months after the date of
termination, notwithstanding that the manager was the only licensed personnel
in the company.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-37-203(a)(2)(A) and (B), concerning
exemptions for noncommercial pest control applicators, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) However, no noncommercial applicator shall use, supervise
the use of, or demonstrate the use of a restricted-use pesticide, as defined
02/18/2025 9:24:51 AM LGL066

SB250
by the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, unless the person
has passed a prescribed examination and has been licensed by the State Plant
Board Department of Agriculture.
(B)(i) The examination shall demonstrate the applicant's
knowledge of how to apply pesticides under the classifications applied for
and his or her knowledge of the nature and effect of the pesticides.
(ii) If the applicant is found qualified and has
paid the required examination and license fees, the board department shall
issue a noncommercial applicator license limited to such activities and
classifications as qualified for.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-37-205 is amended to read as follows:
17-37-205. Applicants previously convicted of violations.
Nothing in this chapter shall require the State Plant Board Department
of Agriculture to issue a license or registration to an applicant who has
been convicted in a court for a violation of this chapter or the Federal
Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-37-206 is amended to read as follows:
17-37-206. License application.
(a) Any person desiring to obtain a license for pest control service
work shall make an application to the State Plant Board Department of
Agriculture on forms provided by the board department, giving complete
information requested.
(b) The applicant must prove to the satisfaction of the board
department that he or she is morally and financially responsible.
(c) An applicant must show proof of at least one (1) year of
experience in the classification for which a license is desired or have
completed at least two (2) years of work in an accredited college or
university, including the completion of at least one (1) basic course in
entomology, to be eligible to take the examination in either of the following
classifications:
(1) Termite and other structural pests; or
(2) Household pests and rodent control.
(d)(1) To demonstrate the ability of the applicant to perform the
classification of work for which a license is desired and to demonstrate his
02/18/2025 9:24:51 AM LGL066

SB250
or her knowledge of the nature and effect of pesticides and how to apply them
safely and properly, the board department shall prescribe in advance an
examination in writing to be taken by the applicant and to be given by a
person designated by the board department who is not interested financially
or otherwise in pest control service work in Arkansas.
(2) This representative shall examine the applicant by a written
an examination as prescribed, and the examination shall be graded by the
examiner or designated proctor with the results being certified to the board
for approval either as having passed or failed the examination as the case
may be.
(e)(1) The board department is directed to give examinations on
various classifications of pest control work on designated dates at least one
(1) time each quarter.
(2) If the applicant is found qualified in one (1) or more of
the classifications, he or she may be licensed to do the classification of
work for which he or she is found qualified upon the payment of the required
fees.
(f) By virtue of these qualifications, the applicant shall be eligible
for certification under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide
Act or state law as a commercial applicator.
(g) By rule, the board department shall make provisions to ensure that
applicators continue to meet the requirements of changing technology and to
assure a continuing level of competence and ability to use pesticides safely
and properly.
(h) Any licensee who fails to renew his or her license for a period of
two (2) years shall be required to follow the same procedure as a new
applicant in obtaining another license.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-37-209 is amended to read as follows:
17-37-209. Eligibility for reexamination.
Any applicant who fails to pass the written examination in any
classification must wait at least three (3) months fourteen (14) days before
being eligible to take another examination in the same classification.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-37-210 is amended to read as follows:
17-37-210. Bond and insurance requirements.
02/18/2025 9:24:51 AM LGL066

SB250
(a) Bond.
(1) Before a license is issued or renewed, the State Plant Board
Department of Agriculture shall be furnished an acceptable surety bond by
each applicant for a license in either of the following classifications:
(A) Termite and other structural pests; or
(B) Household pests and rodent control.
(2)(A)(i) The bond shall be executed by the applicant for a
termite and other structural pests license or any combination of licenses
that includes termite and other structural pests as principal and by a surety
company licensed to do business in this state in the surety amount of one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(ii)(a) The bond shall be executed by an
applicant for a household pests and rodent control license or any combination
of licenses that includes household pests and rodent control as principal and
by a surety company licensed to do business in this state in the surety
amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
(b) Subdivision (a)(2)(A)(ii)(a) of this
section does not apply to a combination of licenses that includes termite and
other structural pests.
(B) The bond shall be for a term not to exceed one (1)
year and shall coincide with the licensing period.
(3)(A) A bond required by this chapter shall be in favor of the
State of Arkansas for the benefit of any person damaged as the result of a
violation of this chapter by an operator licensed under this chapter and for
the benefit of any person who, after entering into a contract with the
licensee, is damaged by the failure of the licensee to properly perform the
contract.
(B) A person claiming against the bond may maintain an
action at law against the licensee and the surety.
(C) The aggregate liability of the surety to all persons
shall not exceed the sum of the bond.
(b) Insurance.
(1) In addition to the bond required in subdivision (a)(1) of
this section, before a license is issued or renewed, each applicant for a
license in the classification of household pests and rodent control or the
classification of general fumigation shall furnish the board department a
02/18/2025 9:24:51 AM LGL066

SB250
certificate of insurance written by an insurance company authorized to do
business in this state covering the public liability of the applicant for
personal injuries for not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)
for any one (1) person, and fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for any one (1)
accident, and not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for property
damage.
(2) In addition to the bond required in subdivision (a)(1) of
this section, before a license is issued or renewed, each applicant for a
license or any combination of licenses that includes the classification of
termite and other structural pests shall furnish the board department a
certificate of insurance for a general liability insurance policy written by
an insurance company authorized to do business in this state covering public
liability of the applicant for personal injuries and property damage in an
amount not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per occurrence
or five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per aggregate.
(c) Cancellation.
(1) The bond and insurance shall not be cancelled or terminated
until at least thirty (30) days after a notice of cancellation is received by
the board department.
(2) Upon failure of a licensee to maintain in full force and
effect the bond and insurance required by this section, the license shall
become void and shall not be reinstated until a satisfactory bond and
insurance have been filed.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 17-37-212(b), concerning the change of
license status related to pest control, is amended to read as follows:
(b) When there is a change in the status of a licensee, such as change
of address, operator in charge, agents, or solicitors, the licensee shall
immediately notify the State Plant Board Department of Agriculture of the
changes.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 17-37-213(a), concerning agents and
solicitors related to pest control, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Each licensed operator shall register with the State Plant Board
Department of Agriculture the name and address of each agent or solicitor and
shall pay to the board department a registration fee annually for each
02/18/2025 9:24:51 AM LGL066

SB250
solicitor and agent at the time of registration.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 17-37-215(b), concerning pest control
operator names, is amended to read as follows:
(b) No person shall issue a solicitor's or agent's license to any
other person for the purpose of operating under any other name except that of
the licensed operator who registers the solicitor or agent with the State
Plant Board Department of Agriculture.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 17-37-217 is amended to read as follows:
17-37-217. Grounds for license invalidation or nonrenewal.
Acts which shall be grounds for invalidation or nonrenewal of a license
shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) Misrepresentations for the purpose of deceiving or
defrauding;
(2) Making of a false statement with knowledge of its falsity
for the purpose of inducing others to act thereon to their damage;
(3) Failure of the licensee to supply the State Plant Board
Department of Agriculture or its authorized representative, upon request,
with true and accurate information concerning methods and materials used or
work performed or other information essential to the administration and
enforcement of this chapter;
(4) Performing work, whether for compensation or not, in a
classification for which the licensee does not have a license;
(5) If repeated inspections by the board department reveal that
the licensee is not securing satisfactory control of the pests or diseases
which the licensee engages to control or eradicate;
(6) Failure of the licensee to register agents or solicitors,
failure to pay registration, inspection, or reporting fees due, or failure to
make reports within the time specified;
(7) Conviction in any court of a violation of this chapter or of
the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act;
(8) Intentional misrepresentation in any application for a
license;
(9) Failure to correct substandard work;
(10) Making a pesticide recommendation or application which is
02/18/2025 9:24:51 AM LGL066

SB250
inconsistent with any or all of the following:
(A) The labeling;
(B) Federal or state registration; or
(C) Federal or state restrictions on the use of that
pesticide; and
(11) Falsification of records or failure to maintain or make
available the records required by this chapter.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 17-37-221(c), concerning contracts,
reports, and records for licensed operators related to pest control, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1)(A) By the fifteenth of each month, every licensed operator
shall file a report with the board Department of Agriculture covering termite
and other structural pest work performed the previous calendar month.
(B) The report required under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of
this section shall include:
(i) A summary listing of each contract issued for
the prevention, control, or eradication of termites or other structural
pests;
(ii) Letters of clearance issued and service
contracts issued regardless of whether chemical treatments were carried out;
(iii) The name and address of the property owner;
(iv) The address of the property; and
(v) Any other information deemed necessary by the
board department and stipulated in the rules adopted under this chapter.
(C) Within forty-eight (48) normal business hours, the
licensed operator shall produce documents requested by an authorized agent of
the board department, including without limitation contracts and related
documents.
(D) Failure to meet timelines set in this section may
result in additional penalties.
(2)(A) Reporting and payment of inspection fees may also be
required for household pest and rodent control work or other classifications
as the board department may specify if deemed necessary or if required by the
Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act.
(B)(i) All fees due the board department shall be filed
02/18/2025 9:24:51 AM LGL066

SB250
with the board by the fifteenth day of each month to cover work performed the
previous calendar month department as stipulated by the rules of the board.
(ii) If payment of fees due is delayed more than
thirty (30) days, then the fees due shall be doubled.
(3) A report shall be filed each month even if no work is
performed.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 17-37-221(e)(1), concerning contracts,
reports, and records for licensed operators related to pest control, is
amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) All licensed operators, qualified operators, or license holders
shall stencil or paint display on both sides of all motor equipment that
requires a state vehicle license the name of the operator or company license
holder with letters at least two inches (2″) high.






















02/18/2025 9:24:51 AM LGL066